dev/verb/verb.ne.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
  <!-- जीउँ; जीउँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जीउँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उम्क; उम्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उम्क__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बजा; बजा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बजा__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लिन; लिन; 3 -->
    <pardef n="लिन__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुहोस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुहोस</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गास्; गास्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गास्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लेख; लेख; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लेख__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जनाउ; जनाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जनाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लगाइए; लगाइए; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लगाइए__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गर्नेछन्; गर्नेछन्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गर्नेछन्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- किन्; किन्; 2 -->
    <pardef n="किन्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- थुन्; थुन्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थुन्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नगर्; नगर्; 2 -->
    <pardef n="नगर्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लेउ; लेउ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="लेउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="fam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मोटाउ; मोटाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मोटाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- टेक्; टेक्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="टेक्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खुल्; खुल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="खुल/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गरि; गरि; 10 -->
    <pardef n="गरि__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दिने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रहने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रहे</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दिए</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दिएँ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रहेछु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दिन्छु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खलबल्याउ; खलबल्याउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खलबल्याउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लिए; लिए; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लिए__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- होलान्; होलान्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="होलान्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- समात्; समात्; 2 -->
    <pardef n="समात्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बजाउ; बजाउ; 3 -->
    <pardef n="बजाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नुहोस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बजाइ; बजाइ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बजाइ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लिं; लिं; 2 -->
    <pardef n="लिं__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भिडाउ; भिडाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भिडाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="जीउँ"><i>जीउँ</i><par n="जीउँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="उम्क"><i>उम्क</i><par n="उम्क__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बजा"><i>बजा</i><par n="बजा__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लिन"><i>लिन</i><par n="लिन__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गास्"><i>गास्</i><par n="गास्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लेख"><i>लेख</i><par n="लेख__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="जनाउ"><i>जनाउ</i><par n="जनाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लगाइए"><i>लगाइए</i><par n="लगाइए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गर्नेछन्"><i>गर्नेछन्</i><par n="गर्नेछन्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="किन्"><i>किन्</i><par n="किन्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="थुन्"><i>थुन्</i><par n="थुन्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="नगर्"><i>नगर्</i><par n="नगर्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लेउ"><i>लेउ</i><par n="लेउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="मोटाउ"><i>मोटाउ</i><par n="मोटाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="टेक्"><i>टेक्</i><par n="टेक्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="खुल्"><i>खुल</i><par n="खुल/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गरि"><i>गरि</i><par n="गरि__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="खलबल्याउ"><i>खलबल्याउ</i><par n="खलबल्याउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लिए"><i>लिए</i><par n="लिए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="होलान्"><i>होलान्</i><par n="होलान्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="समात्"><i>समात्</i><par n="समात्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बजाउ"><i>बजाउ</i><par n="बजाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बजाइ"><i>बजाइ</i><par n="बजाइ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लिं"><i>लिं</i><par n="लिं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भिडाउ"><i>भिडाउ</i><par n="भिडाउ__vblex"/></e>
